Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska44-112
Department of Insurance; records.

The Department of Insurance shall preserve in a permanent form a record of its proceedings, and the acts and proceedings of its officers, including a concise statement of the results of all investigations or examinations of insurance companies.

Laws 1913, c. 154, § 17, p. 405;

R.S.1913, § 3153;

Laws 1919, c. 190, tit. V, art. III, § 10, p. 583;

C.S.1922, § 7754;

C.S.1929, § 44-210;

R.S.1943, § 44-112.